District of Columbia statutes.
21-2091

Repealed

Right to disclaim interest in property.

Repealed.

Mar. 6, 1991, D.C. Law 8-204, § 2, 37 DCR 8439
July 25, 1995, D.C. Law 11-30, § 5(a), 42 DCR 1547
Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 806, 48 DCR 2087
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-205, § 3(b), 53 DCR 9063
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 308, 56 DCR 1117
1981 Ed., § 21-2091.

Section 1102 of D.C. Law 13-292 provided: “For purposes of Title 5 and Title 9 and sections 801(b), 805, and 806 of Title 8 of this act, the provisions relating to the administration of decedent’s estates shall apply only to the estates of decedent’s who die on or after the effective date of this act.”

D.C. Law 17-353, § 308, made a technical correction in the repeal of this section by D.C. Law 16-205, § 3(b).

New Uniform Disclaimer of Property Interests: See § 19-1501 et seq.

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 1 of the Uniform Disclaimer of Property Interests Act.